Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20112-4006
Board; membership; transitional
provisions.

The member serving district
1 as it existed prior to May 18, 2011, shall assume the role of serving district
1 as defined by section 2-4004, and his or her term shall expire on July 1,
2014. The member serving district 3 as it existed prior to May 18, 2011, act
shall assume the role of serving new district 2 as defined by section 2-4004,
and his or her term shall expire on July 1, 2013. The member serving as the
at-large member prior to May 18, 2011, shall assume the role of serving district
3 as defined by section 2-4004, and his or her term shall expire on July 1,
2013. The Governor shall appoint a member to serve district 4 as defined by
section 2-4004, and the term of such member shall expire on July 1, 2012.
The member serving district 2 as it existed prior to May 18, 2011, shall assume
the role of serving as the at-large member appointed by the board as defined
by section 2-4004, and his or her term shall expire on July 1, 2012. The member
serving district 4 as it existed prior to May 18, 2011, shall assume the role
of serving as an at-large member appointed by the Governor as defined by section
2-4004, and the term of such member shall expire on July 1, 2013. The member
serving district 5 as it existed prior to May 18, 2011, shall assume the role
of serving as an at-large member appointed by the Governor as defined by section
2-4004, and the term of such member shall expire on July 1, 2014.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB107, § 3.
May 18, 2011